quicklisp-local/cl-typesetting-20110219-svn/hyphen-patterns/dehyphn.txt
% patterns
.aa6l
.ab1l
.ab1r
.ab3a4s
.ab3ei
.ab3it
.ab3u
.abi2
.ad3o4r
.alti6
.an1e
.an1s
.an5alg
.ana3c
.ang8s2t1
.ap1p
.ar6sc
.ar6ta
.ar6tei
.as2z
.au2f1
.au2s3
.be3na
.be5erb
.ber6t5r
.bie6r5
.bim6s5t
.brot3
.bru6s
.ch6
.che6f5
.da2r
.da8c
.dar5in
.dar5u
.de3sz
.de5r6en
.de8spo
.den6ka
.des6pe
.dia3s4
.dien4
.dy2s1
.ehren5
.ei6n5eh
.ei8nen
.ein5sa
.eine6
.en3k4
.en4t3r
.en6d5r
.en6der
.en8ta8
.en8tei
.epo1
.er3ei
.er3in
.er3o4b
.er5er
.er6b5ei
.er6ban
.er6bla
.er6d5um
.erwi5s
.es1p
.es8t1l
.es8t1n
.ex1a2
.ex3em
.fal6sc
.fe6st5a
.flu4g3
.furch8
.ga6ner
.ge3n4a
.ge5rö
.ges6
.hal6br
.halb5
.halbe6
.hau4t
.haup4
.he4r3e
.he5x
.heima6
.her6za
.hin3
.hir8sc
.ho4c
.hu3sa
.hy5o
.ibe5
.ima6ge
.in1
.ini6
.is5chi
.jagd5
.ka6ph
.kal6k5o
.ki4e
.kop6f3
.kraf6
.kü5ra
.lab6br
.liie6
.lo6s5k
.lö4s3t
.ma5d
.mi2t1
.mis2s1
.no6th
.no6top
.ob1l
.ob6st5e
.obe8ri
.obs2
.or3c
.ort6s5e
.ost3a
.oste8r
.pe3ts
.pe4re
.ph6
.po8str
.rau4m3
.re5an
.ro8q
.ru5the
.rü5be
.sch8
.se5n6h
.se5ra
.se6e
.si2e
.spi6ke
.st4
.sy2n
.ta8th
.tages5
.tan6kl
.te6e
.te8str
.to6der
.to6we
.to8nin
.um1
.umpf4
.un1
.une6
.unge5n
.ur1c
.ur5en
.ve6rin
.vora8
.wah6l5
.we8ges
.we8s2t
.wes3te
.wo6r
.wor3a
.wun4s
.zi4e
.zuch8
.ände8re
.öch8
1abdr
1abf
1abg
1abhä
1abko
1abn
1abw
1adj
1adle
1adv
1aero
1afri
1aggr
1agog
1akad
1akko
1algi
1anfa
1anfä
1anl
1anr
1appa
1arzt
1asth
1athl
1aufn
1aufw
1ausb
1ausf
1ausg
1ausw
1ausz
1auto
1ba
1be
1bi
1blat
1blu
1bo
1br
1bu
1by1
1bä
1bü
1c6r
1c8o
1ca
1ce
1chae
1chef
1ci
1ckad
1cke.
1ckel
1cken
1cker.
1ckere
1ckern
1ckert
1ckeru
1ckie
1ckig
1ckun
1cu
1cy
1da.
1dac
1dat
1de
1di
1do
1drah
1dria
1dru
1drü
1du
1dä
1dü
1egy
1eign
1ekd
1elek
1emp1f
1empt
1emto
1entz
1etn
1exp
1extr
1f8ran
1fe
1fi
1flor
1fo
1fris
1fu
1fä
1fü
1g2lik
1g2lim
1g2ly
1ga
1ge
1ghr
1gi
1glad
1glas
1gle.
1glem
1gloa
1glon
1glop
1glü
1gna
1gno
1go
1gr4
1gu
1gä
1gö
1gü
1haa
1hemm
1hoh
1holz
1info
1k2o
1ka
1kla
1klä
1kr8
1ku
1kä
1kö
1kü
1la.
1land
1law
1lehr
1ler
1li
1lok
1los.
1lun
1ly
1lös
1ma
1me
1mi
1mo
1mun
1my
1män
1mü
1n2ah
1n2ar.
1na.
1nae
1nag
1nai
1nama
1nani
1nann
1nari
1naue
1nav
1naß
1naß
1ne
1ni
1nu
1nys
1näc
1nöt
1o2zea
1obj
1offi
1okta
1ons
1oog
1opti
1oram
1ordn
1orga
1p2o
1p2sy
1pak
1pap
1pau
1pe
1ph
1pis
1pres
1prob
1prod
1präs
1prüf
1pu
1qui
1r2ig
1r4uf
1rarh
1re.
1reno
1rer
1rinn
1rohr
1ruts
1s2ki.
1s2phä
1s2pur
1sa.
1saa
1saf
1sag
1sai
1sal
1sam
1sand
1sas
1sat
1sche
1schi
1scho
1schu
1se
1si
1so
1span
1spek
1spi
1spra
1spru
1spü
1sta
1sto
1stu
1stä
1stö
1stü
1su
1sy
1sä
1süc
1sün
1t2sua
1tafe4
1tag
1tale
1tari
1teil
1the.
1theo
1thes
1thet
1thr6
1thy
1tilg
1trag
1trai
1trib
1träg
1tu1e
1tuc
1tumh
1tums
1ty1
1tön
1tür.
1u2nif
1unfä
1ve
1wah
1was
1weg
1wid
1wj
1xag
1xe.
1xen
1xes
1xi
1xo
1xu
1zah
1ze
1zi
1zo
1zu
1zwi
1zy
1zä
1zö
1zü
1ße
1ße
1ßi
1ßi
1ßu8
1ßu8
1ähnl
1äug
1äuß
1äuß
1ö2ko
1öl.
2a1re
2a1ri
2a1ti
2arbt
2b1b
2b1c
2b1d
2b1f8
2b1g2
2b1h
2b1k2
2b1m
2b1n
2b1p2
2b1t
2b1w
2blun
2ch.
2chn6
2chs
2cht
2ck.
2cks
2d1arb
2d1auf
2d1aus
2d1b
2d1c
2d1d
2d1ehr
2d1f
2d1g
2d1h
2d1ins
2d1k
2d1l
2d1m
2d1n6
2d1org
2d1p
2d1und
2d1v
2d1w
2d1z
2dabg
2danl
2deal
2deol
2dju
2drer
2ds
2dt
2e1ri
2e1ru
2eni
2erei
2f1art
2f1b2
2f1d
2f1eck
2f1g2
2f1k2
2f1m
2f1n
2f1op
2f1p8
2f1w
2f1z
2ff
2fs
2ft
2g1arc
2g1arm
2g1atm
2g1b
2g1f8
2g1g
2g1k
2g1m
2g1p2
2g1t
2g1w
2gler
2gnah
2gog
2grig
2grot
2gs
2gue.
2hal.
2hani
2hein
2hoi
2hö.
2höe
2i1v
2if
2ige
2il
2io
2ip
2k1b
2k1c
2k1eig
2k1f8
2k1g
2k1h
2k1k2
2k1m
2k1p2
2k1rec
2k1t
2k1w
2k1z
2kanl
2klic
2krib
2krip
2ks
2l1abs
2l1amt
2l1g
2l1m
2l1ord
2l1t
2l1umf
2l1umw
2l1w
2lb
2lick
2ließ
2ließ
2lint
2ls
2luh
2läug
2m1amp
2m1b
2m1c
2m1d
2m1f6
2m1g
2m1h
2m1imm
2m1k8
2m1l
2m1m
2m1r
2m1t
2m1v
2m1w
2m1z
2mp
2ms
2n1ang
2n1arc
2n1art
2n1d
2n1emp
2n1err
2n1erz
2n1imp
2n1ind
2n1ins
2n1onk
2n1ort
2n1und
2n1unt
2nax
2nec
2negy
2nobt
2nu6r
2nup
2p1haf
2p3rig
2pek
2perr
2pft
2ph.
2pler
2plig
2porn
2pst
2puc
2r1arb
2r1art
2r1ex
2r1ir
2r1s
2r1t
2r1umg
2r1uml
2r1unt
2r1ur
2rall
2reh
2remt
2ress
2rn
2rr
2rums
2s1abs
2s1ans
2s1arb
2s1art
2s1atl
2s1aus
2s1b2
2s1d
2s1eig
2s1emp
2s1f2
2s1inf
2s1inh
2s1ins
2s1m
2s1odo
2s1ord
2s1pf
2s1r
2s1sch
2s1ta.
2s1tan.
2s1tani
2s1trua
2s1tung
2s1unt
2s1v
2s1w
2s1ü2b
2s2s1ei
2s3g2
2s7tus
2sca
2schf
2schg
2schh
2schk
2scht
2schz
2sco
2siat
2skau
2skow
2sku
2spap
2spis
2spla
2spol
2ssa
2sse
2ssi
2sso
2ssä
2ssö
2ssü
2st.
2st1s6
2st5rig
2stag
2stb
2stg
2sth
2stk
2stl
2stm
2stt
2stue
2stv
2stw
2t1amt
2t1arm
2t1b2
2t1c
2t1d
2t1ehr
2t1f2
2t1g2
2t1hau
2t1hil
2t1hö
2t1j
2t1k2
2t1l
2t1m8
2t1n
2t1ony
2t1p2
2t1t
2t1unt
2t1v
2t1w
2tanr
2tark
2tart
2tehe
2th.
2th1l
2th1m
2thaa
2toti
2trec
2trig
2ts
2tz
2uc
2v1b
2v1f
2v1g
2v1k
2v1l
2v1m
2v1p
2v1t
2v1v
2v1z
2v2s
2w1l
2z1ara
2z1b
2z1ex
2z1f8
2z1k
2z1l
2z1m
2z1s8
2z1t
2z1v
2z1z
2z1ü2b
2ß1ei
2ß1ei
3abtei
3adres
3al8arm
3album
3analy
3angab
3angri
3annah
3anzug
3apfel
3arbei
3atlas
3auffü
3aufga
3auftr
3auge.
3ausd
3blau.
3ble.
3blä
3blü
3chari
3effek
3eifri
3eleme
3entla
3erbse
3erklä
3ernst
3europ
3flöt
3för
3gleic
3glied
3ideal
3ideol
3indus
3infek
3jä
3kleid
3kow
3lig
3loch.
3losig
3länd
3man
3mas
3mes
3mitt
3mäß
3mäß
3müt
3nacht
3naz
3o4pera
3obst.
3paa
3partn
3pers
3preis
3rable
3reakt
3refl
3rock.
3röll
3rümp
3s2tec
3s2teg
3s2teh
3s2teif
3s2teig
3s2tein
3s2tell
3s2telz
3s2temm
3s2temp
3s2tep
3s2teue
3s2tic
3s2tieb
3s2tieg
3s2tif
3s2til
3s2tim
3s2tink
3s2titu
3s4kin.
3s8aue
3s8eit
3s8prec
3sack.
3sarg
3scha.
3schaf
3schal
3schri
3sel.
3skrib
3skrip
3straß
3straß
3strec
3strum
3suc
3t4hea
3thal.
3this
3tobe
3traue
3treib
3troc
3umfan
3undzw
3unfal
3unglü
3urlau
3ursac
3urtei
3zaun
3äq
3ärmel
3ärztl
3ätk
3ü4ber1
4a1tr
4aner.
4blich
4chh
4ck1ent
4ckh
4d3art
4d3inh
4d3reg
4d3uh
4drech
4e1lo
4e5re.
4emo
4ene.
4ener.
4erer.
4f1h
4f3lein
4ferd.
4fling
4g1v
4g3eise
4g3ex3
4g3ins
4g3reic
4g3uh
4gak
4grut
4herap
4k1d
4k3arti
4k3leit
4k3rad
4k3reic
4k3ämi
4kusti
4l3entw
4l3erg
4l3indu
4l3inh
4l3o4per
4l3ohr
4l3unte
4lauss
4lauto
4lektr
4lentz
4leuro
4linkt
4lipp
4lisam
4lort
4lurg
4m3arbe
4m5auf
4magg
4n1ein
4n1int
4n1org
4n1uhr
4n3e4lem
4n3en3th
4n3i6gel
4n3o4per
4n3obs
4nauf
4p1d
4peic
4persi
4ph3the
4plei
4r3eina
4r3eins
4r3enth
4r3entw
4r3erd
4r3erla
4r3erns
4ralg
4reben
4rinst
4rofe
4s1aff
4s1akt
4s1j
4s2talg
4s2tigm
4s2tinf
4s3alpi
4s3ox
4s3techn
4sentz
4sope
4sorga
4spers
4st3ope
4stafe
4stans
4steil
4strai
4struf
4stuc
4stür.
4t1hä
4t1reg
4t3entw
4t3erbt
4t3rez
4tab.
4tabs
4taufn
4teff
4teinh
4teis
4telek
4tholz
4ths
4treif
4tüb
4v3w
4v5n
4xiste
4z1h
4z1p
4z3ak
4z3eff
4z3imp
4z3oh
4zemp
5a4gent
5a6blö
5a6brec
5a6l5eth
5a6meise
5a6n1o2d
5a6n3oma
5a6nord
5ablag
5abze
5abzu
5addi
5akro1
5anfert
5angebo
5anhä
5anschl
5anstal
5antenn
5anwä
5anzeig
5anzieh
5anäs
5atlant
5aufent
5blit
5blum
5blö
5chara
5chato
5chiad
5chias
5chlor
5cho.
5chthon
5cä1
5d4eic
5d6scha.
5dschik
5e6lasti
5eltern
5energi
5entwic
5entwu
5epid
5epos
5erfül
5ergebn
5ergänz
5erhöhu
5erlös.
5erstat
5erwerb
5essenz
5f8läc
5flop
5frei.
5ghel.
5glaub
5gleis
5glom
5gogr
5grif
5heft
5hitz
5horn.
5index
5ingeni
5inhab
5inj
5inspe
5instit
5instru
5intere
5interv
5jo
5klet
5klip
5klop
5ladu
5laken
5lampe.
5leistu
5leuc
5lipt
5loge.
5lohn
5luk
5läuf
5meld
5mot
5mün
5n6ars
5nanc
5napf.
5naui
5neei
5näe
5näi
5näus
5nü.
5nüß
5nüß
5o4bers
5o6rient
5ohm.
5olym
5orgel.
5p6ty
5pad
5partei
5pflanz
5pinse
5pla
5pol
5poti
5prinz
5prog
5py
5rafal
5rald
5rangi
5reha
5rente
5rhyt
5rout
5röhr
5römis
5s4hop
5s6ause
5s6hip
5s6pom
5s6zene.
5schade
5schlag
5schlu
5schö
5schü
5sein.
5spal
5spring
5spän
5streif
5söm
5süß
5süß
5t6sik
5tause
5techn
5teppi
5tha.
5therap
5therf
5thi.
5tite
5tocht
5toll.
5topf.
5tropf
5trub
5trup
5trüb
5täg
5tüch
5umlau
5undein
5ungea
5ware
5wech
5weise
5werdu
5werk.
5wirt
5wunde.
5ya.
5zange.
5zweck
5ßa.
5ßa.
5änderu
5ärgern
5ö6dem
5öffn
5österr
5ü2bu
6a1tu
6aba
6abel
6atf
6atg
6atn
6aum
6b1lad
6b1v
6b3lein
6b5eisen
6blag
6ch2m
6ch3unt
6chb
6chei
6cherkl
6chf
6chins
6chp
6chuh
6d5alk
6d5obe
6d5ony
6d5rh
6d5unt
6dabt
6dabw
6dans
6danzu
6deff
6dinf
6dje
6dord
6doth
6dre.
6durl
6dursa
6däh
6e1nat
6e1ro.
6e3roi
6elan
6elef
6enem.
6enen
6enes
6eren.
6f1c
6f1j
6f1v
6f3lon
6f5otte
6f5ums
6fanl
6fap
6frig
6funf
6fäug
6g1hei
6g1hi
6g1rec
6g3arti
6g5amt
6g5auf
6g5entf
6g5erz.
6g5oh
6g5unt
6gabw
6ganl
6garb
6gd
6glass
6gn.
6gonist
6groh
6gued
6gärm
6güb
6h1emp
6hale
6hanz
6harb
6horg
6hr
6jm
6k1v
6k3arbe
6k5ein
6k5eis
6k5ler.
6k5ox
6kentz
6kinh
6kner
6krig
6kroba
6l1h
6l1j
6l1k
6l1p
6l1übe
6l5atm
6l5ents
6l5erde
6l5erzie
6l5u6nio
6laff
6lann
6lanä
6larm.
6ld
6leff
6lendun
6lepi
6lerkl
6lexp
6linj
6ll
6ln
6lorg
6lurs
6lymp
6m5ony
6m5uh
6mappa
6mj
6möl
6n1arm
6n1ü2b
6n5ebn
6n5energ
6n5erde.
6n5erhö
6n5ertra
6n5inh
6n5inn
6n5o6leu
6n5ox
6n5ums
6n5umw
6n5unr
6nair
6natm
6nausb
6nauto
6nopf
6nopti
6ns
6nuni
6ose
6p1m
6p5heit
6p5les
6p5ling
6p5uh
6paug
6phb
6phg
6phn
6phz
6r1arz
6r1m
6r3einb
6r5einn
6r5ernä
6r5erreg
6r5i6tal
6rabz
6raha
6ranga
6rapf
6ratl
6raus.
6reign
6reing
6reinr
6rempf
6rerbs
6rewo
6rinner
6rk
6robs
6rolym
6roog
6rundz
6runf
6s1abt
6s1arz
6s2tind
6s3a4der
6s3antr
6s3e4lem
6s3tref
6s4teuro
6s5eid.
6s5einh
6s5ents
6s5i6dee
6s5o4fen
6s5pig
6s5pos
6s5traum
6s5u6ran
6s5änd
6sabw
6salter
6sanl
6schef
6schmäß
6schmäß
6schnaß
6schnaß
6schord
6schp
6schs
6schv
6scu
6seröf
6sexp
6sk.
6skn
6sna
6snot
6spinse
6spoti
6spreis
6sprob
6spy
6ss5um
6st5anf
6stale
6stanw
6starb
6staus
6stc
6std
6steppi
6stf
6stoll.
6stopf.
6stord
6stp
6streno
6stres
6strev
6sträg
6stz
6sumfa
6surte
6säugi
6säuß
6säuß
6t1hab
6t1q
6t1red
6t1röh
6t3acht
6t3hand
6t5a6mer
6t5haf
6t5herz
6t5o6fen
6t5rosa
6t5umr
6tadr
6tamp
6tanl
6tarbe
6tarz
6tausg
6teign
6terben
6terklä
6thals
6thopti
6topt
6tuh
6tund
6tunf
6ty6o
6täh
6täuß
6täuß
6ui
6uk
6und.
6v5c
6v5h
6vang
6varb
6vd
6ve5g6
6w5t
6w5w
6wk
6ws2
6x1l
6x3w
6z1am
6z1c
6z1d
6z1j
6z1n
6z1r
6z1wo
6z5as
6z5engel
6z5inf
6z5inni
6z5uhr
6zöl.
6ß5um
6ß5um
6äi
8a1lu
8a1ta
8ad.
8afa
8afä
8ame.
8apl
8artei
8atmus
8aß
8aß
8b1leg
8b1leh
8b1los
8b1z
8b5riem
8ba8del
8becht
8becke.
8beff
8bex
8blam
8bleid
8bleih
8bling
8boff
8bonk
8bref
8bröh
8bs
8c1t
8chanz
8chj
8chob
8chw
8corb
8d1ren
8d3reic
8d5amt
8daas
8dabr
8danzi
8darz
8datm
8denge.
8dengen
8derdb
8deul
8dind
8drak
8drem
8dres.
8drind
8drut
8dsl
8duml
8dumw
8durt
8dänd
8ech3n
8eifen
8eraba
8f1ric
8feins
8feltern
8femp
8finf
8flib
8färm
8föf
8g3leu
8gabz
8gansc
8geff
8gerhö
8gl.
8gnach
8gnot
8gof
8gord
8grenn
8gums
8gä8m
8hae
8han.
8helt
8heo
8höi
8i1i
8ind.
8k5ents
8kachs
8kakz
8kapf
8karz
8keic
8kemp
8ki8ö
8kik
8klac
8klig
8l1r
8labf
8labh
8ladv
8lamb
8lanme
8lanw
8lappa
8lc
8leinn
8lemp
8lends
8lenzy
8leoz
8lepo
8lerbs
8lerö
8lesel
8limb
8linv
8lobl
8lu8fe
8m1q
8m5anst
8mabg
8malde
8mangr
8memp
8mentsp
8mof
8n1amt
8n1w
8n5entn
8n5ents
8nabn
8naly
8nanw
8neis
8nemb
8nentb
8nentl
8nerbi
8nerlö
8neuß
8neuß
8ninf
8nost.
8numl
8o1g
8oni
8p5c
8phd
8phk
8poh
8proß
8proß
8pär
8r1g
8r1j
8r5elt
8rabk
8ramei
8ranf
8ranw
8rd
8reff
8reier
8rentl
8rentz
8rerhö
8rerkl
8rerlö
8runs
8s1anw
8s2t1ris
8s5erzi
8sapo
8sch.
8schanc
8schb
8schex
8schric
8schrig
8schrou
8schunt
8seff
8sermä
8sexa
8skü
8spaa
8sphi
8stalk
8stamt
8stesse
8streib
8stun.
8stäg
8stüch
8sumk
8syl.
8szu
8t3reis
8t5antr
8tabz
8tanwa
8taus.
8tausf
8teiw
8telem
8tentz
8terbar
8terbs
8terhö
8texp
8thak
8thir
8tobj
8tock
8trepo
8tumt
8tym
8tä8st
8tö8k
8vanb
8vint
8vo8f
8vra
8w1n
8werc
8x1b
8x1h
8x1t
8x3p2
8x5o6d
8xamt
8xf
8xid
8xn
8z5wes
8za6d
8zanl
8zein
8zergä
8zerz
8zinsuf
8zunem
8zungl
8ße8g
8ße8g
8ße8h
8ße8h
8ßem
8ßem
a1bl
a1che
a1chi
a1cho
a1chu
a1chy
a1d
a1e2d
a1er.
a1gn
a1ha
a1he
a1hi
a1hu
a1j
a1ke
a1ki
a1le
a1lo
a1lä
a1mu
a1mä
a1nad
a1nas
a1nat
a1no
a1nö
a1os
a1pa
a1pi
a1pr
a1ra
a1rol
a1ru
a1ry
a1sa
a1str
a1te
a1th
a1to
a1tä
a1tü
a1v
a1w
a1x
a1ya
a1z
a2dre
a2f1ex
a2ph1t
a2s1to
a2xia
a3fal
a3inse
a3ismu
a3nac
a3pü
a3ros
a3s4hi
a4ce.
a4h3erh
a4kade
a4l3ein
a4l5ob
a4r3af
a4s3tel
a5arti
a5chal
a5far
a5fat
a5ho
a5isch.
a5lal
a5ny
a5pä
a6blaß
a6blaß
a6ch5erf
a6d5ac
a6dä
a6f5um
a6fentl
a6g5und
a6l5e6be
a6lert
a6lur
a6mate
a6n5erd
a6n5erke
a6pos2t
a6poth
a6schec
a6schn
a6t5ops
a6t5ort.
a6t5ru
a6tapf
a6teli
a6wes
a6xio
a8blä
a8chent
a8dein
a8lel
a8lerb
a8lerh
a8nerf
a8ror
